District of Columbia statutes.
1-1516.01

Historical Preservation, Reorganization 2000

(Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 402, 47 DCR 6308.)
Statute text

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs for the operation and implementation of the historic preservation functions of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs as set forth in section III(B)(8) of Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983, are hereby transferred to the Office of Planning, established pursuant to Mayor's Order 83-25, effective January 3, 1983.

All of the functions assigned and authority delegated to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs concerning historic preservation as set forth in section III(B)(8) of Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983 are hereby transferred to the Office of Planning, established pursuant to Mayor's Order 83-25, effective January 3, 1983.

2001 Ed., Title 1, Chapter 15, Subchapter XVI, Part A.